Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1703
Approved massage therapy school, defined.

Approved massage therapy school means (1) one which is approved by the board, (2) one which requires for admission a diploma from an accredited high school or its equivalent, (3) one which has attached to its staff a regularly licensed physician and employs one or more competent massage therapists as instructors, and (4) one which has a minimum requirement of a continuous course of study and training of not less than one thousand hours distributed over a term of not less than nine months. Such study and training shall consist of one hundred hours of each of the following: Physiology; anatomy; massage; pathology; hydrotherapy; hygiene and practical demonstration; and health service management. The remaining three hundred hours shall be obtained in subject areas related to the clinical practice of massage therapy.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 610.